Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [135A.0435] ATHLETIC FEES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Athletic fees. new text end new text begin The governing body of a public postsecondary institution must not impose or maintain any mandatory student fee or increase tuition for the purpose of compensating student athletes. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalty. new text end new text begin If the governing body of a public postsecondary institution violates subdivision 1, the commissioner of management and budget must deduct from the postsecondary institution's appropriation base an amount equal to one percent of the postsecondary institution's appropriation base in the first year of the next biennium. new text end